Hawaii statutes.
§468E-7 Functions and powers of the board.
(a) In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the board,
in accordance with chapters 91 and 92, shall administer, coordinate, and
enforce this chapter.

(b) In addition to other powers and duties
authorized by law, the board, in accordance with chapter 91, shall adopt rules
relating to professional conduct to effectuate the policy of this chapter,
including but not limited to rules that establish ethical standards of
practice, and for other purposes, and may amend or repeal the same. [L 1974, c
48, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 320, §5; am L 1992, c 202, §171]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next